Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1215
Nonrecord material; destruction;
procedure; personal and political papers; preservation.

(1)
If not otherwise prohibited by law, nonrecord materials, not included within
the definition of records as contained in section 84-1202, may be destroyed
at any time by the state or
local agency in possession thereof without the prior approval of the administrator
or board. The administrator may formulate procedures and interpretations to
guide in the disposal of nonrecord materials, but nothing therein shall be
contrary to any provision of law relating to the transfer of materials of
historical value to the State Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society.

(2) Members of the Legislature and other officials are encouraged to
offer their personal and political papers of public interest to the State
Archives for preservation subject to any reasonable restrictions concerning
their use by other persons.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 15, p. 1393;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 12, p. 3176;

Laws 1980, LB 747, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 22.